Florida, session 2026, SB1288.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSection 258.603, Florida Statutes, is created to 11 read: 12 258.603âAndrew âRedâ Harris Spoil Island designated.â 13 (1)âSI3, a mangrove island adjacent to the Intracoastal 14 Waterway within Jupiter Sound, is designated as the âAndrew 15 âRedâ Harris Spoil Island.â 16 (2)âThe Department of Environmental Protection is directed 17 to erect suitable markers designating the âAndrew âRedâ Harris 18 Spoil Islandâ as described in subsection (1). 19 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.